North Carolina, session 2025, SB820.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Part 1 of Article 26 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended
by adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-378.5. Protections for individuals based on immigration status.
(a) For purposes of this section, "immigration authorities" means persons representing or
working for U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement (ICE) or U.S. Customs and Border
Protection (CBP).
(b) Public school units shall not deny a student admission, enrollment, or participation in
an educational program based on the student's national origin or immigration status. Public
school units shall not require documentation of immigration status as a condition of admission
or enrollment.
(c) Public school units shall not allow immigration authorities to perform immigration
enforcement actions on school grounds unless required by judicial warrant, court order, or State
or federal law.
(d) Public school units shall not disclose personally identifiable student information to
immigration authorities unless required by judicial warrant, court order, or State or federal law.
(e) Public school units may establish protocols for responding to requests from
immigration authorities while ensuring compliance with State and federal laws."
SECTION 2. Article 2 of Chapter 115D of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
*S820-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"§ 115D-20.3. Protections for individuals based on immigration status.
Community colleges shall comply with the protections for individuals based on immigration
status under G.S. 116-40.15."
SECTION 3. Part 3 of Article 1 of Chapter 116 of the General Statutes is amended
by adding a new section to read:
"§ 116-40.15. Protections for individuals based on immigration status.
(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(1) Immigration authorities. – Persons representing or working for U.S.
Immigration and Customs Enforcement (ICE) or U.S. Customs and Border
Protection (CBP).
(2) Public institution of higher education. – A community college as defined in
G.S. 115D-2(2) or a constituent institution of The University of North
Carolina.
(b) A public institution of higher education shall not deny a student admission,
enrollment, or participation in an educational program based on the student's national origin or
immigration status. The institution shall not require documentation of immigration status as a
condition of admission or enrollment.
(c) A public institution of higher education shall not allow immigration authorities to
perform immigration enforcement actions on campus unless required by judicial warrant, court
order, or State or federal law.
(d) A public institution of higher education shall not disclose personally identifiable
student information to immigration authorities unless required by judicial warrant, court order,
or State or federal law.
(e) A public institution of higher education may establish protocols for responding to
requests from immigration authorities while ensuring compliance with State and federal laws."
SECTION 4.(a) The title of Article 32F of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes
reads as rewritten:
"Supplemental School Funding.Funding and Other Allotments."
SECTION 4.(b) Article 32F of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-472.30. Limited English proficient allotment.
To the extent funds are made available for this purpose, the State Board of Education shall
allocate funds to local school administrative units, charter schools, regional schools, and
laboratory schools operated under Article 29A of Chapter 116 of the General Statutes to provide
services to students with limited English proficiency. The State Board shall allocate these funds
under a formula that takes into account the average number of students in the units, charter
schools, regional schools, or laboratory schools over the past three years who have limited
English proficiency. Local school administrative units shall use funds allocated to them to pay
for classroom teachers, teacher assistants, tutors, textbooks, classroom materials/instructional
supplies/equipment, transportation costs, family engagement and translation services, bilingual
services for limited English proficient students, and professional development of teachers for
students with limited English proficiency. A county in which a local school administrative unit
receives funds under this section shall use the funds to supplement local current expense funds
and shall not supplant local current expense funds."
SECTION 4.(c) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of one hundred eighty-one million dollars ($181,000,000) in recurring
funds beginning with the 2026-2027 fiscal year to provide services and instructional supports for
students with limited English proficiency.
SECTION 4.(d) Section 7.15 of S.L. 2003-284 is repealed.
SECTION 5. Section 4 of this act becomes effective July 1, 2026. The remainder of
this act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 820-First Edition